Hawaii, session 2026, HB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has a rich seafaring history beginning with the voyaging settlers of the islands.  Throughout history, the fair-weather ports of the islands have welcomed trade, seafaring workers, and travelers.  Today the maritime industry plays a vital role in the State's economy and culture.  Maritime operations at the state harbors provide a majority of all basic necessities including food, clothing, construction materials, fuel and other essential supplies. The purpose of this Act is to establish          of each year as Maritime Day to preserve Hawaii's maritime history and celebrate the contributions of port operations and maritime workers to Hawaii's economy and culture. SECTION 2.  Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§8-     Maritime Day.  To preserve Hawaii's maritime history and celebrate the importance of the maritime industry to the State's economy and culture,          of each year shall be known and designated as "Maritime Day"; provided that this day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________